trunk/incubator/apertium-fo-is.fo.dix
    <pardef n="stríð__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anna</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ið</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ið</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ini</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ini</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inum</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>num</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sins</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unum</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="grunnur__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anna</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arnar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arnir</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inum</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sins</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>m</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>num</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="eykam/aður__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r>aður<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>aður<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nnanna</l>
          <r>aður<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nna</l>
          <r>aður<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nnin</l>
          <r>aður<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nninum</l>
          <r>aður<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nni</l>
          <r>aður<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nn</l>
          <r>aður<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nsins</l>
          <r>aður<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ns</l>
          <r>aður<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ennar</l>
          <r>aður<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enninar</l>
          <r>aður<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enninir</l>
          <r>aður<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ennir</l>
          <r>aður<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enn</l>
          <r>aður<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enn</l>
          <r>aður<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>manninum</l>
          <r>aður<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onnum</l>
          <r>aður<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onnunum</l>
          <r>aður<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="veðurmaður"><i>veðurm</i><par n="eykam/aður__n"/></e>
    <e lm="herflotamaður"><i>herflotam</i><par n="eykam/aður__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prestaformaður"><i>prestaform</i><par n="eykam/aður__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skyldmaður"><i>skyldm</i><par n="eykam/aður__n"/></e>
    <e lm="landsmaður"><i>landsm</i><par n="eykam/aður__n"/></e>
    <e lm="landstingsmaður"><i>landstingsm</i><par n="eykam/aður__n"/></e>
    <e lm="umboðsnevndarformaður"><i>umboðsnevndarform</i><par n="eykam/aður__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fiskasølumaður"><i>fiskasølum</i><par n="eykam/aður__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tjóðveldismaður"><i>tjóðveldism</i><par n="eykam/aður__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sandavágsmaður"><i>sandavágsm</i><par n="eykam/aður__n"/></e>
    <e lm="undanmaður"><i>undanm</i><par n="eykam/aður__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oljuríkmaður"><i>oljuríkm</i><par n="eykam/aður__n"/></e>
    <e lm="varaformaður"><i>varaform</i><par n="eykam/aður__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sjálvstýrismaður"><i>sjálvstýrism</i><par n="eykam/aður__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stríð"><i>stríð</i><par n="stríð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="valstríð"><i>valstríð</i><par n="stríð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="megindeildarformaður"><i>megindeildarform</i><par n="eykam/aður__n"/></e>
    <e lm="framsøgumaður"><i>framsøgum</i><par n="eykam/aður__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eigindómur"><i>eigindómur</i><par n="grunnur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grunnur"><i>grunnur</i><par n="grunnur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mentanartilboð"><i>mentanartilboð</i><par n="stríð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hópdrápsmaður"><i>hópdrápsm</i><par n="eykam/aður__n"/></e>
    <e lm="upphavsmaður"><i>upphavsm</i><par n="eykam/aður__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rúmdarmaður"><i>rúmdarm</i><par n="eykam/aður__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fregnartænastuyvirmaður"><i>fregnartænastuyvirm</i><par n="eykam/aður__n"/></e>
    <e lm="landstingsformaður"><i>landstingsform</i><par n="eykam/aður__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eykamaður"><i>eykam</i><par n="eykam/aður__n"/></e>
    <e lm="partamaður"><i>partam</i><par n="eykam/aður__n"/></e>
    <e lm="landsrættarformaður"><i>landsrættarform</i><par n="eykam/aður__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kriminaleftirlitsmaður"><i>kriminaleftirlitsm</i><par n="eykam/aður__n"/></e>
    <e lm="atkvøðustríð"><i>atkvøðustríð</i><par n="stríð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fjølmiðlamaður"><i>fjølmiðlam</i><par n="eykam/aður__n"/></e>
